North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 1. Board of Agriculture.

§ 106-1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 509, s. 52.

§ 106-2.
Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services established; Board of Agriculture, membership, terms of office, etc.

Department and Board Established. — The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is created and established and shall be under the control of the Commissioner of Agriculture, with the consent and advice of a board to be established and named “The Board of Agriculture.”

Membership; Qualifications. — The Board of Agriculture shall consist of the Commissioner of Agriculture, who shall be an ex officio member and chairman thereof and shall preside at all meetings, and of 11 other members from the State, so distributed as to reasonably represent the different sections and agriculture of the State. The Commissioner of Agriculture and the members of the Board of Agriculture shall be practicing farmers engaged in their profession. The members of the Board shall be appointed by the Governor by and with the consent of the Senate. In the appointment of the members of the Board the Governor shall also take into consideration the different agricultural interests of the State, and shall appoint members with the following qualifications:

One member who shall be a practicing tobacco farmer to represent the tobacco farming interest.

One member who shall be a practicing cotton grower to represent the cotton interest.

One member who shall be a practicing fruit or vegetable farmer to represent the fruit and vegetable farming interest.

One member who shall be a practicing dairy farmer to represent the dairy and cattle interest of the State.

One member who shall be a practicing poultryman to represent the poultry interest of the State.

One member who shall be a practicing peanut grower to represent the peanut interests of the State.

One member who shall be experienced in marketing to represent the marketing of products of the State.

One member who shall be actively involved in forestry to represent the forestry interests of the State.

One member who shall be actively involved in the nursery business to represent the nursery industry of the State.

One member who shall be a practicing general farmer to represent the general farming interest.

One member who shall be a practicing pork farmer to represent the swine interest of the State.

Terms. — The term of office of members of the Board shall be six years and until their successors are duly appointed and qualified.

Vacancies. — Vacancies in the Board shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term.

History.

Code, s. 2184; 1901, c. 479, ss. 2, 4; Rev., s. 3931; 1907, c. 497, s. 1; C.S., s. 4667; 1931, c. 360, s. 1; 1937, c. 174; 1995, c. 509, s. 53; 1997-261, ss. 15, 16; 2011-145, s. 13.22A(dd); 2013-99, s. 1; 2013-342, s. 1.

State Government Reorganization.

The Board of Agriculture was transferred by

G.S. 143A-59

, enacted by Session Laws, 1971, c. 864.

§ 106-3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 509, s. 54.

§ 106-4.
Meetings of Board.

The Board of Agriculture, herein established, hereafter called “the Board,” shall meet for the transaction of business in the City of Raleigh at least twice a year, and oftener, if called by the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

1901, c. 479, s. 3; Rev., s. 3935; C.S., s. 4669; 1921, c. 24; 1929, c. 252; 1931, c. 360, s. 2.

§ 106-5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-74, s. 1.

§ 106-6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 509, s. 54.

§ 106-6.1.
Fees.

A board or commission within the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may establish fees or charges for the services it provides. The Board of Agriculture, subject to the provisions of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes, may establish a rate schedule for the use of facilities operated by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 11.2, effective July 1, 2011.

History.

1981, c. 495, s. 10; 1987, c. 827, s. 25; 1997-261, s. 109; 1999-413, s. 5; 2009-451, s. 11.3; 2011-145, s. 11.2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 11.3, effective July 1, 2009, designated the previously existing provisions as subsection (a), and added subsection (b).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 11.2, effective July 1, 2011, repealed subsection (b).

§ 106-6.2.
Create special revenue funds for certain agricultural centers.

The Eastern North Carolina Agricultural Center Fund is created within the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services as a special revenue fund. This Fund shall consist of receipts from the sale of naming rights to any facility located at the Eastern North Carolina Agricultural Center at Williamston, investments earnings on these monies, and any gifts, devises, or grants from any source for the benefit of the Eastern North Carolina Agricultural Center. All interest that accrues to this Fund shall be credited to this Fund. Any balance remaining in this Fund at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert. The Department may use this Fund only to promote, improve, repair, maintain, or operate the Eastern North Carolina Agricultural Center.

The Southeastern North Carolina Agricultural Center Fund is created within the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services as a special revenue fund. This Fund shall consist of receipts from the sale of naming rights to any facility located at the Southeastern North Carolina Agricultural Center at Lumberton, investments earnings on these monies, and any gifts, devises, or grants from any source for the benefit of the Southeastern North Carolina Agricultural Center. All interest that accrues to this Fund shall be credited to this Fund. Any balance remaining in this Fund at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert. The Department may use this Fund only to promote, improve, repair, maintain, or operate the Southeastern North Carolina Agricultural Center.

History.

1998-212, s. 13.2; 2011-284, s. 72.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 72, effective June 24, 2011, in the second sentence in subsections (a) and (b), substituted “devises” for “bequests” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 106-6.3.
Create special revenue fund for research stations.

The Research Stations Fund is established as a special revenue fund within the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, Division of Research Stations. This Fund shall consist of receipts from the sale of timber and other commodities produced on the Department’s research stations and any gifts, bequests, or grants for the benefit of this Fund. No General Fund appropriations shall be credited to this Fund. Any balance exceeding one million dollars ($1,000,000) in this Fund at the end of any fiscal year shall revert to the General Fund. The Department shall use this Fund only to develop, improve, repair, maintain, operate, or otherwise invest in research stations operated by the Department’s Research Stations Division.

History.

2012-142, s. 11.4; 2014-100, s. 13.8; 2021-180, s. 10.4(b).

§ 106-6.4.
Create special revenue fund for certain facilities.

The Agricultural Marketing Facilities Fund is established as a special revenue fund within the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, Marketing Division. This Fund shall consist of receipts from the lease or rental of property or facilities, admissions, fees, and any gifts, bequests, or grants collected at the Department’s farmers markets and agricultural centers. The Department shall use this Fund to develop, improve, repair, maintain, operate, expand, or otherwise invest in the Department’s farmers markets and agricultural centers.

History.

2021-180, s. 10.5A.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.8, made this section, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 10.5A, effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§§ 106-7,
106-8.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 509, s. 54.

§ 106-9.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-74, s. 2.

§ 106-9.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 509, s. 54.